Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General

§ 35-22-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see article 4 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1984, ch. 38, § 1, pertained to living wills.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 35-22-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 35-22-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.